test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-matsikini_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - matsikíni - ok : # -m inanimate noun, shoe AEW NA1
     matsikíni+NI+Sg: matsikíni
     matsikíni+NI+Pl: matsikínistsi
     matsikíni+NI+Non: matsikíni

     matsikíni+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: natsikíni
     matsikíni+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: natsikínistsi
     matsikíni+NI+Px1Sg+Non: natsikíni

     matsikíni+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: natsikínnaani
     matsikíni+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: natsikínnaanistsi
     matsikíni+NI+Px1Pl+Non: natsikínnaani

     matsikíni+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: katsikínnooni
     matsikíni+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: katsikínnoonistsi
     matsikíni+NI+Px21Pl+Non: katsikínnooni

     matsikíni+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: katsikíni
     matsikíni+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: katsikínistsi
     matsikíni+NI+Px2Sg+Non: katsikíni

     matsikíni+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: katsikínoaawayi
     matsikíni+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: katsikínoaawaistsi
     matsikíni+NI+Px2Pl+Non: katsikínoaawai

     matsikíni+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: matsikíniaayi
     matsikíni+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: matsikíístsi
     matsikíni+NI+Px3Sg+Non: matsikíni

     matsikíni+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: matsikínoaawayi
     matsikíni+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: matsikínoaawaistsi
     matsikíni+NI+Px3Sg+Non: matsikínoaawai
